Vermont, session 2025-2026, S116.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds that courts have determined there is a
distinction as to whether a viable fetus is considered a person under Vermont
law. In Vaillancourt v. Medical Center Hospital of Vermont, Inc., 139 Vt. 138
(1980), the Court held that “there exists statutory wrongful death liability for
the negligently caused death of an unborn, viable fetus.” However, in State v.
Oliver, 151 Vt. 626 (1989), the Court found that “an unborn fetus is not a
person within the meaning of [Vermont’s criminal statutes].” The Court in
Oliver stated that if a fetus is to be considered a person for purposes of the
criminal statutes, the “task must be accomplished by the legislature.”
VT LEG #381155 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.116
2025 Page 2 of 3
(b) The purpose of this act is to protect the right of a pregnant woman to
carry a child to term and to hold perpetrators of crimes against an unborn child
fully accountable.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 15 is added to read:
§ 15. CRIMES AGAINST AN UNBORN CHILD
(a) As used in this section, “unborn child” means the offspring of human
beings prior to birth. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an
unborn child shall be deemed a person for purposes of criminal offenses of this
State when the unborn child suffers bodily injury or death as a result of a
criminal offense.
(b) Prosecution for a criminal offense that causes bodily injury to, or the
death of, an unborn child shall not require the State to prove:
(1) that the person who engaged in the conduct knew or should have
known that the mother of the unborn child was pregnant; or
(2) that the person intended to cause bodily injury to, or the death of, the
unborn child.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the prosecution of:
(1) a woman for actions with respect to her unborn child;
(2) any person for conduct relating to an abortion for which the consent
of the pregnant woman, or a person authorized to make medical decisions on
her behalf, has been obtained; or
VT LEG #381155 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.116
2025 Page 3 of 3
(3) any person for any medical treatment of the pregnant woman or her
unborn child.
Sec. 3. RIGHT OF INTERVENTION
The General Assembly, by joint resolution, may appoint one or more of its
members who cosponsored this act to intervene as a matter of right in any case
in which the constitutionality of the act is challenged.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381155 v.1